Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-815
Bridge repairs; yearly contracts; terms.

The county board shall have the power and is hereby authorized to make yearly contracts for repairing all bridges and approaches to bridges which are required to be built, repaired, and maintained by the county, at a specified sum per unit quantity in place.

Laws 1905, c. 126, § 5, p. 540;

R.S.1913, § 2960;

C.S.1922, § 2718;

C.S.1929, § 39-805;

R.S.1943, § 39-815.

This section is not applicable to repairing of bridges across irrigation ditches. Dawson County v. Dawson County Irr. Co., 104 Neb. 137, 176 N.W. 78 (1920); Dawson County Irr. Co. v. Dawson County, 103 Neb. 692, 173 N.W. 696 (1919).